Hawaii, session 2025, HB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201M-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  A majority of all the members [to which the board is entitled] currently serving on the board shall constitute a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of all the members [to which the board is entitled] currently serving on the board shall be necessary to make any action of the board valid[.]; provided that at least five members are necessary to constitute a quorum to do business and validate any action of the board." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST